Louisiana, session 2026, HB302.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 26:911(A)(7) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§911. Acts prohibited
A. No person, agent, associate, employee, representative, or servant of any
person shall permit any of the following acts to be done on or about any premises
which sells or offers for sale tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor
products:
* * *
(7)(a) When prohibited by municipal or parish ordinance, the sale, offer for
sale, storing, or maintaining of stock of vapor products on any licensed premises
situated within three hundred feet or less of a school as defined by R.S.
17:405(A)(2).
(b) In municipalities and in unincorporated areas which are divided into
subdivisions with streets, blocks, and sidewalks, subject to the adoption of the
alternate method of measurement as provided for in Subparagraph (c) of this
Paragraph, the distance of three hundred feet shall be measured as a person walks
using the sidewalk from the nearest point of the property line of the school to the
nearest point of the licensed premises. The provisions of this Paragraph shall apply
to any licensed premises upon the adoption of the municipal or parish ordinance.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 302 ENROLLED
(c) A municipality or parish may adopt an ordinance establishing an alternate
method of measurement of the three hundred foot limitation by measuring in a
straight line from the nearest point of the property line of the school to the nearest
point of the licensed premises. Such alternate method of measurement applies only
prospectively to any new permit issued on or after the date the ordinance establishing
the alternate measurement has been adopted.
(d) The provisions of this Paragraph shall not apply to lawful marijuana or
marijuana products authorized pursuant to R.S. 40:1046 et seq. and regulated by the
Louisiana Department of Health.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.